Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska87-807
Act; applicability.

The Financial Data Protection and Consumer Notification of Data Security Breach Act of 2006 applies to the discovery of or notification pertaining to a breach of the security of the system that occurs on or after July 14, 2006.

Laws 2006, LB 876, § 7.